Massachusetts, session 194th, S1281.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 41 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 97D the
following section:-
Section 97D½. (a) There shall be a task force established to complete a systematic review
of the laws pertaining to domestic violence and sexual assault reports and confidentiality. The
task force shall consist of: the attorney general or a designee; the president of the Massachusetts
District Attorneys Association or a designee; the colonel of the state police or a designee; the
executive director of Massachusetts office for victim assistance or a designee; 2 members
appointed by the senate president, 1 of whom shall represent domestic or sexual violence
programs in the Commonwealth, have experience working directly with survivors of domestic
and sexual violence, or be a survivor of domestic or sexual violence; 2 members appointed by
of 2

the speaker of the house of representatives, 1 of whom shall represent domestic or sexual
violence programs in the Commonwealth, have experience working directly with survivors of
domestic and sexual violence, or be a survivor of domestic or sexual violence; 1 member
appointed by the minority leader of the senate; 1 member appointed by the minority leader of the
house of representatives; and 2 persons appointed by the governor, 1 of whom shall represent
domestic or sexual violence programs in the Commonwealth, have experience working directly
with survivors of domestic and sexual violence, or be a survivor of domestic or sexual violence.
The members of the task force shall appoint a chair.
(b) The task force shall: (i) assess the adequacy of laws pertaining to domestic violence,
sexual assault, and confidentiality including, but not limited to, section 97D of chapter 41 of the
General Laws; (ii) identify and review the impact of said section 97D; and (iii) develop
recommendations to ensure confidentiality of domestic violence survivors without protecting
perpetrators.
(c) The task force shall submit a report of its findings and legislative recommendations to
the clerks of the senate and the house of representatives and the chairs of the joint committee on
the judiciary not later than 18 months after the effective date of this act. The task force shall
determine if subsequent reports shall be necessary to properly address this issue.
of 2